District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1740

Powers and duties of Mayor; evidentiary use of copies of Commission documents; record of Commission proceedings.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 5, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(d), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(d), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1924.
Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.